Washington statutes.
RCW 19.166.050

Standards.

The secretary of state shall adopt standards for international student exchange visitor placement organizations. In adopting the standards, the secretary of state shall strive to adopt standards established by the United States Information Agency and the council on standards for international educational travel and strive to achieve uniformity with national standards. The secretary of state may incorporate standards established by the United States Information Agency or the council on standards for international educational travel by reference and may accept an organization's designation by the United States Information Agency or acceptance for listing by the council on standards for international educational travel as evidence of compliance with such standards.

[ 1991 c 128 s 4.]